Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-635
Metal tire, defined.

Metal tire shall mean every tire the surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard nonresilient material.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 131.